Utah statutes.
41-22-8.   Registration fees.

(1)  The board shall establish the fees which shall be paid in accordance with this chapter, subject to the following:

(a)  The fee for each registration may not exceed $17.

(b)  The fee for each duplicate registration card may not exceed $3.

(c)  The fee for each duplicate registration sticker may not exceed $5.

(2) A fee may not be charged for an off-highway vehicle that is owned and operated by the United States Government, this state, or its political subdivisions.

